West Virginia, session 2026, HB4157.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 6. Canvass of Returns; Declaration of Results; Recordkeeping. §3-6-4a. Filing requirements for write-in candidates. [Repealed.] NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to remove the requirement that write-in candidates file with the Secretary of State before votes for said candidates can be counted.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home